Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.486

Distribution in kind.

A partner does not have a right to demand or receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash. Subject to RCW 25.10.621(2), a limited partnership may distribute an asset in kind to the extent each partner receives a percentage of the asset equal to the partner's share of distributions.

[ 2009 c 188 s 506.]